Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB791.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 157.200 TO 157.290 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Injury" means physical harm inflicted by another person on a student,
teacher, staff member, or other individual;
(b) "Self-contained special education classroom":
1. Means a public school classroom for students in preschool through
grade twelve (12) in which at least half of the students in regular
attendance are provided special education services; and
2. Includes a calm-down room, sensory room, common area, or room
attached to a classroom where special education services are provided;
and
(c) "Surveillance system" means a video and audio surveillance system that
continuously monitors a self-contained special education classroom while
students and teachers are present.
(2) A public school district shall:
(a) Install, maintain, and regularly monitor a surveillance system in every self-
contained special education classroom in the district that records all areas
of each classroom, except that a bathroom or any area in a classroom in
which a student's clothes are changed shall not be monitored;
(b) Within the first five (5) days of a student's assignment to a self-contained
special education classroom, provide the following to the parent of the
student:
1. Notice of the use of a surveillance system to continuously monitor
students, teachers, and staff present in the classroom;
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
2. A copy of the informational guide published by the Kentucky
Department of Education in accordance with subsection (7) of this
section; and
3. District-specific instructions on how to request access to view video
and audio surveillance system recordings in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section, including the contact information of any
school district employee responsible for receiving such requests; and
(c) Display clear signage notifying room occupants of the surveillance system.
(3) (a) A parent of a student recorded in surveillance system recordings shall be
permitted access to view portions of the recordings that feature his or her
child in accordance with KRS 160.715.
(b) Upon a request from a parent to review a recording that features his or her
child, a school district shall maintain the recording and make reasonable
and timely effort to redact or segregate the portions of the recording directly
related to other students, without destroying the meaning of the recording.
If redaction or segregation of the recording cannot reasonably be
accomplished, or if doing so would destroy the meaning of the recording,
then the parents of each student not redacted or segregated in the recording
shall be:
1. Sent notice of the fact that another parent has requested lawful access
to review those portions of a recording; and
2. Permitted access to review those portions of a recording or any other
recording the parent would be entitled to review under this subsection.
(c) This section shall not be interpreted to limit any rights or protections
afforded under 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g et seq. or KRS 160.700 to 160.730.
(4) Surveillance system recordings shall be retained according to the following
schedule:
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
(a) If no parent has requested to review the recording and the recording does
not include, or allegedly include, an injury to a student, teacher, staff
member, or other individual, for at least one (1) month;
(b) If a parent has requested to review an existing recording, until one (1)
month from the date the parent is notified of being granted access to review
the recordings; and
(c) If the district has knowledge that an existing recording includes, or
allegedly includes, an injury to a student, teacher, staff member, or other
individual, until the school district investigation of the injury and any law
enforcement action arising from the injury is complete or for two (2)
months, whichever is later.
(5) If a school district has knowledge of an injury, or alleged injury, of a student
inflicted by a school district employee in a self-contained special education
classroom, the school district shall notify the parent of each student in attendance
in the self-contained education classroom at the time of the injury or alleged
injury.
(6) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy to carry out this section.
(7) No later than January 1, 2027, the Kentucky Department of Education shall
develop and publish an informational guide for parents to understand and
exercise the rights afforded under this section, including instructions on how to
request access to video and audio surveillance system recordings and other
educational records.
(8) A surveillance system installed and operated in accordance with this section shall
be exempt from consent requirements under KRS Chapter 526.
Section 2. KRS 157.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Exceptional children and youth" means persons under twenty-one (21) years of
age who differ in one (1) or more respects from same-age peers in physical, mental,
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
learning, emotional, or social characteristics and abilities to such a degree that they
need special educational programs or services for them to benefit from the regular
or usual facilities or educational programs of the public schools in the districts in
which they reside. The Department of Education, through administrative
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education, shall interpret the
statutory definitions of exceptionality. An exceptionality is any trait so defined in
this section or by administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education. Requirements of average daily attendance for exceptional classes shall
be regulated by statute, or in the absence of direction by administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education. Categories of exceptionalities
included within, but not limited by, this definition are as follows:
(a) "Orthopedic impairment" means a severe physical impairment of bone or
muscle which adversely affects educational performance to the extent that
specially designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit from
education. The term includes physical impairments caused by congenital
anomaly, disease, and from other causes;
(b) "Other health impaired" means limited strength, vitality, or alertness,
including a heightened alertness to environmental stimuli, due to a chronic or
acute health problem which adversely affects educational performance to the
extent that specially designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit
from education. Chronic health problems may include, but are not be limited
to, a heart condition, tuberculosis, sickle cell anemia, hemophilia, epilepsy,
rheumatic fever, nephritis, asthma, lead poisoning, leukemia, diabetes,
attention deficit disorder, attention deficit hyperactive disorder, or acquired
immune deficiency syndrome;
(c) "Speech or language impairment" means a communication disorder such as
stuttering, impaired articulation, impaired language, impaired voice, delayed
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
acquisition of language, or absence of language that adversely affects
educational performance to the extent that specially designed instruction is
required for the pupil to benefit from education;
(d) "Hearing impairment" means a physiological hearing loss:
1. Ranging from mild to profound, which is either permanent or
fluctuating, and of such a degree that the pupil is impaired in the
processing of linguistic information via the auditory channel either with
or without amplification; or
2. That adversely affects educational performance so that specially
designed instruction is required for the child or youth to benefit from
education.
The term shall include both deaf and hard of hearing children;
(e) "Mental disability" means a deficit or delay in intellectual and adaptive
behavior functioning, which adversely affects educational performance to the
extent that specially designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit
from education, and which is typically manifested during the developmental
period;
(f) "Specific learning disability" means a disorder in one (1) or more of the
psychological processes primarily involved in understanding or using spoken
or written language, which selectively and significantly interferes with the
acquisition, integration, or application of listening, speaking, reading, writing,
reasoning, or mathematical abilities. "Specific learning disability" may
include conditions such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, dysgraphia, developmental
aphasia, or perceptual motor disabilities. The disorder is lifelong, intrinsic to
the individual, and adversely affects educational performance to the extent
that specially designed instruction is required in order for the pupil to benefit
from education. Determination of the existence of a specific learning
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
disability shall include documentation that a child does not make sufficient
progress in meeting age or grade-level content standards when provided with
appropriate instruction and learning experiences delivered by qualified
personnel, including the child's response to scientific, research-based
interventions and additional information derived from an individual
evaluation. The term does not include a learning problem which is primarily
the result of:
1. A hearing impairment;
2. Visual, physical, mental, or emotional-behavioral disabilities;
3. Environmental, cultural, or economic differences; or
4. Limited English proficiency;
(g) "Emotional-behavioral disability" means a condition characterized by
behavioral excess or deficit which significantly interferes with a pupil's
interpersonal relationships or learning process to the extent that it adversely
affects educational performance so that specially designed instruction is
required in order for the pupil to benefit from education;
(h) "Multiple disability" means a combination of two (2) or more disabilities
resulting in significant learning, developmental, or behavioral and emotional
problems, which adversely affects educational performance and, therefore,
requires specially designed instruction in order for the pupil to benefit from
education. A pupil is not considered to have a multiple disability if the
adverse effect on educational performance is solely the result of deaf-
blindness or the result of speech or language disability and one (1) other
disabling condition;
(i) "Deaf-blind" means auditory and visual impairments, the combination of
which creates such severe communication and other developmental and
learning needs that the pupil cannot be appropriately educated in special
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
education programs designed solely for pupils with hearing impairments,
visual impairments, or severe disabilities, unless supplementary assistance is
provided to address educational needs resulting from the two (2) disabilities;
(j) "Visually disabled" means a visual impairment, which, even with correction,
adversely affects educational performance to the extent that specially
designed instruction is required for the pupil to benefit from education. The
term includes both partially seeing and blind pupils;
(k) "Developmental delay" means a significant discrepancy between a child's
current level of performance in basic skills such as cognition, language or
communication, self-help, social-emotional, or fine or gross motor, and the
expected level of performance for that age. The term shall be used only with
children ages three (3) through eight (8);
(l) "Traumatic brain injury" means an acquired impairment to the neurological
system resulting from an insult to the brain which adversely affects
educational performance and causes temporary or permanent and partial or
complete loss of:
1. Cognitive functioning;
2. Physical ability; or
3. Communication or social-behavioral interaction.
The term does not include a brain injury that is congenital or degenerative, or
a brain injury induced by birth trauma;
(m) "Autism" means a developmental disability significantly affecting verbal and
nonverbal communication and social interaction, generally evident before age
three (3), that adversely affects educational performance. Characteristics of
autism include:
1. Engagement in repetitive activity and stereotyped movement;
2. Resistance to environmental change or change in daily routine; and
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
3. Unusual responses to sensory experience.
The term does not include children with characteristics of an emotional-
behavioral disability; and
(n) "Gifted and talented student" means a pupil identified as possessing
demonstrated or potential ability to perform at an exceptionally high level in
general intellectual aptitude, specific academic aptitude, creative or divergent
thinking, psychosocial or leadership skills, or in the visual or performing arts.
(2) "Parent" or "parent or guardian" means a parent, legal guardian, person acting
as a parent in the absence of a parent or guardian, or other individual or agency
responsible for a student.
(3) "Special education" means educational instruction and special services designed
[specially designed instruction ]to meet the unique needs of an exceptional child or
youth.
(4)[(3)] "Special educational facilities" means physical facilities designed or adapted
to meet the needs of exceptional children and youth, and approved according to
regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(5)[(4)] "Related services" means transportation and the developmental, corrective,
and other supportive services required to assist an exceptional child or youth to
benefit from special education, and may include, but are not limited to, speech-
language pathology and audiology services; psychological services; physical and
occupational therapy; recreation, including therapeutic recreation; early
identification and assessment of disabilities; counseling services, including
rehabilitation counseling; orientation and mobility services; medical services for
diagnostic or evaluation purposes; school health services; social work services in
schools; and parent counseling and training.
(6)[(5)] "Transition services" means a coordinated set of activities for a pupil designed
within an outcome-oriented process, that promotes movement from school to
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2140
postschool activities. The term includes:
(a) Postsecondary education;
(b) Vocational training; and
(c) Integrated employment, including supported employment, continuing and
adult education, adult services, independent living, or community
participation.
The coordinated set of activities shall be based on the individual pupil's needs,
taking into account the pupil's preferences and interests, and shall include
instruction, community experience, the development of employment, and other
postschool adult living objectives, and, if appropriate, acquisition of daily living
skills and functional vocational evaluation.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/26/2026 6:38 PM Jacketed